Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3103
Terms, defined.

As used in the Nebraska Professional Association Mutual Insurance Company Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Professional association mutual insurance company shall mean any domestic insurance company licensed under the act for the purpose of making insurance as provided in sections 44-3104 and 44-3105. For the purposes of this subdivision, professional association shall mean any organization of individual professional practitioners who are required by this state to obtain a license or other legal authorization prior to performing a professional service, including, but not limited to, certified public accountants, public accountants, dentists, osteopathic physicians, physicians and surgeons, veterinarians, and attorneys at law;

(2) Director shall mean the Director of Insurance; and

(3) Member shall mean an individual belonging to an association as defined in subdivision (1) of this section and whose principal practice is located in this state.

Laws 1978, LB 656, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 342, § 3.